Utah statutes.
62A-5a-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Council" means the Coordinating Council for Persons with Disabilities.

(2)  "State agencies" means:

(a)  the Division of Services for People with Disabilities and the Division of Substance Abuse and Mental Health, within the Department of Human Services;

(b)  the Division of Health Care Financing within the Department of Health;

(c)  family health services programs established under Title 26, Chapter 10, Family Health Services, operated by the Department of Health;

(d)  the Utah State Office of Rehabilitation; and

(e)  special education programs operated by the State Office of Education and local school districts under Title 53A, Chapter 15, Part 3, Education of Children with Disabilities.

